Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.025

Purchases of works of art—Procedure.

The Washington state arts commission shall, in consultation with the boards of regents of the University of Washington and Washington State University and with the boards of trustees of the regional universities, The Evergreen State College, and the community and technical college districts, determine the amount to be made available for the purchases of art under RCW 28B.10.027, and payment therefor shall be made in accordance with law. The designation of projects and sites, the selection, contracting, purchase, commissioning, reviewing of design, execution and placement, acceptance, maintenance, and sale, exchange, or disposition of works of art shall be the responsibility of the Washington state arts commission in consultation with the board of regents or trustees.

[ 2015 c 55 s 201; 2005 c 36 s 2; 1990 c 33 s 557; 1983 c 204 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 169 s 8; 1974 ex.s. c 176 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Statutory references—Severability—1990 c 33: See RCW 28A.900.100 through 28A.900.102.

Severability—1983 c 204: See note following RCW 43.46.090.

Severability—Nomenclature—Savings—1977 ex.s. c 169: See notes following RCW 28B.10.016.

Acquisition of works of art for public buildings and lands—Visual arts program established: RCW 43.46.090.

Allocation of moneys for acquisition of works of art—Expenditure by arts commission—Conditions: RCW 43.17.200.

Purchase of works of art—Interagency reimbursement for expenditure by visual arts program: RCW 43.17.205.

State art collection: RCW 43.46.095.